Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 4 State Entomologist [Repealed]

§§ 11-4-101 through 11-4-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 16, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This chapter derived from Laws 1925, ch. 148, §§ 1 through 3 and 38.

Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 3, purported to amend § 11-4-103, but this amendment was not given effect due to the repeal of this section by Laws 1991, ch. 16, § 1.